Washington statutes.
RCW 43.210.130

Minority business export outreach program.

The small business export finance assistance center shall develop a minority business export outreach program. The program shall provide outreach services to minority-owned businesses in Washington to inform them of the importance of and opportunities in international trade, and to inform them of the export assistance programs available to assist these businesses to become exporters.

[ 1993 c 512 s 5.]

NOTES:

Office of minority and women's business enterprises: Chapter 39.19 RCW.